Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.052

Redetermination and refixing of minimum term of confinement.

At any time after the board (or the court after July 1, 1986) has determined the minimum term of confinement of any person subject to confinement in a state correctional institution for a crime committed before July 1, 1984, the board may request the superintendent of such correctional institution to conduct a full review of such person's prospects for rehabilitation and report to the board the facts of such review and the resulting findings. Upon the basis of such report and such other information and investigation that the board deems appropriate, the board may redetermine and refix such convicted person's minimum term of confinement whether the term was set by the board or the court.

The board shall not reduce a person's minimum term of confinement unless the board has received from the department of corrections all institutional conduct reports relating to the person.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 324; 1986 c 224 s 10; 1983 c 196 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 67 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—Severability—1986 c 224: See notes following RCW 9.95.001.